District of Columbia statutes.
9-411.04

Roadway improvements and curbs and gutters completed after May 25, 1943.

No assessments shall be levied under §§ 9-421.01 to 9-421.04, for any roadway improvement completed subsequent to May 25, 1943, but for curbs or gutters, or curbs and gutters, completed subsequent to May 25, 1943, assessments shall be levied against the abutting property in accordance with the provisions of this subchapter.

History

May 25, 1943, 57 Stat. 83, ch. 98, § 4

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-617.
1973 Ed., § 7-612d.